Florida, session 2026, SB40.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 12 409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 13 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 14 (2)âThe agency shall establish such contract requirements 15 as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care 16 program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem 17 necessary, the contract must require: 18 (c)âAccess.â 19 1.âThe agency shall establish specific standards for the 20 number, type, and regional distribution of providers in managed 21 care plan networks to ensure access to care for both adults and 22 children. Each plan must maintain a regionwide network of 23 providers in sufficient numbers to meet the access standards for 24 specific medical services for all recipients enrolled in the 25 plan. The exclusive use of mail-order pharmacies may not be 26 sufficient to meet network access standards. Consistent with the 27 standards established by the agency, provider networks may 28 include providers located outside the region. 29 2.âThe agency shall establish specific standards to ensure 30 enrollees have access to network providers during state holidays 31 and outside of regular business hours. At least 50 percent of 32 primary care providers participating in a plan provider network 33 must offer appointment availability to Medicaid enrollees 34 outside of regular business hours. For the purposes of this 35 subparagraph, the term âoutside of regular business hoursâ means 36 Monday through Friday between 5 p.m. and 8 a.m. local time and 37 all day Saturday and Sunday. 38 3.âEach plan shall establish and maintain an accurate and 39 complete electronic database of contracted providers, including 40 information about licensure or registration, locations and hours 41 of operation, specialty credentials and other certifications, 42 specific performance indicators, and such other information as 43 the agency deems necessary. The database must be available 44 online to both the agency and the public and have the capability 45 to compare the availability of providers to network adequacy 46 standards and to accept and display feedback from each 47 providerâs patients. 48 4.âEach plan shall submit quarterly reports to the agency 49 identifying the number of enrollees assigned to each primary 50 care provider. 51 5.âThe agency shall conduct, or contract for, systematic 52 and continuous testing of the provider network databases 53 maintained by each plan to confirm accuracy, confirm that 54 behavioral health providers are accepting enrollees, and confirm 55 that enrollees have access to behavioral health services. 56 6.2.âEach managed care plan shall must publish any 57 prescribed drug formulary or preferred drug list on the planâs 58 website in a manner that is accessible to and searchable by 59 enrollees and providers. The plan must update the list within 24 60 hours after making a change. Each plan must ensure that the 61 prior authorization process for prescribed drugs is readily 62 accessible to health care providers, including posting 63 appropriate contact information on its website and providing 64 timely responses to providers. For Medicaid recipients diagnosed 65 with hemophilia who have been prescribed anti-hemophilic-factor 66 replacement products, the agency shall provide for those 67 products and hemophilia overlay services through the agencyâs 68 hemophilia disease management program. 69 7.3.âManaged care plans, and their fiscal agents or 70 intermediaries, must accept prior authorization requests for any 71 service electronically. 72 8.4.âManaged care plans serving children in the care and 73 custody of the Department of Children and Families must maintain 74 complete medical, dental, and behavioral health encounter 75 information and participate in making such information available 76 to the department or the applicable contracted community-based 77 care lead agency for use in providing comprehensive and 78 coordinated case management. The agency and the department shall 79 establish an interagency agreement to provide guidance for the 80 format, confidentiality, recipient, scope, and method of 81 information to be made available and the deadlines for 82 submission of the data. The scope of information available to 83 the department is shall be the data that managed care plans are 84 required to submit to the agency. The agency shall determine the 85 planâs compliance with standards for access to medical, dental, 86 and behavioral health services; the use of medications; and 87 follow up followup on all medically necessary services 88 recommended as a result of early and periodic screening, 89 diagnosis, and treatment. 90 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.